trunk/apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghts</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>own</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ids</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ade</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idden</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/go__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>goes</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>went</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gone</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ees</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aw</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>een</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ell__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ells</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="go out">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go down">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go in">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go on">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go on">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on</l><r><j/>on<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go back">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go through">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>through</l><r><g><b/>through</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go up">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fly"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flee"><i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="forbid"><i>forb</i><par n="forb/id__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foresee"><i>fores</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="go"><par n="/go__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="light"><i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sell"><i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tell"><i>t</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="undergo"><i>under</i><par n="/go__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="go Dutch">      <i/>      <par n="/go__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>Dutch</l><r><g><b/>Dutch</g></r></p></e>
